Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-903
Court acting pursuant to Nebraska Juvenile Code; disposition of children.

Any court acting pursuant to the Nebraska Juvenile Code shall commit to the care of the Department of Health and Human Services or any regularly organized and incorporated society or institution, for the purpose of caring for and placing in good family homes, all children, except those already committed to the care of responsible persons or institutions, who have been decreed to be children as described in subdivision (3)(a) of section 43-247 and who for that reason must be removed from the care of their parents or legal guardians.

Laws 1911, c. 62, § 9, p. 275;

R.S.1913, § 7233;

C.S.1922, § 6890;

C.S.1929, § 83-508;

R.S.1943, § 83-241;

Laws 1988, LB 790, § 29;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 183.

Nebraska Juvenile Code, see section 43-2,129.